West Virginia, session 2026, SB218.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-5-13e Community School Support Fund. (a) The Legislature finds that the demographic, social, and cultural diversity of our communities requires a flexible approach to school planning and funding.(b) The Legislature finds that the culture and social dynamics of schools located near affluent neighborhoods may differ substantially from schools located in economically challenged communities with lower incomes.(c) The Legislature finds that social and emotional dynamics within smaller schools are more favorable to students from low-income neighborhoods than larger schools.(d) The Legislature finds that smaller schools located in relatively close proximity to student homes meet the needs of students from low-income rural neighborhoods more effectively than larger schools with longer times in transit.(e) The purpose of this section is to create within the Department of Education a Community School Support Fund, or "CSS Fund."(f) The West Virginia State Superintendent of Schools shall review all programs and initiatives within the budget of the Department of Education and identify areas where sufficient savings and efficiencies can be found to fund an account exclusively for the support of community schools at risk for consolidation and closure due to decreased enrollment, school aid formula compliance, and associated operational challenges.(g) The Superintendent shall identify and set aside an annual sum of $5 million toward the CSS fund.(h) Each school at risk for closure or consolidation which qualified for Federal Title 1 during the 2024-2025 school year will also automatically qualify for assistance from the fund up to, but not exceeding, 20% of the total operating cost of the school.(1) Application shall be made by the Local School Improvement Council of the requesting school;(2) Compliance with school funding formula regarding professional and service personnel is exempt; and(3) The Superintendent is authorized to utilize Step 7 funds toward cost of personnel, operation of facility, and other necessary expenses for sustaining the viability of the school.